Idaho, session 2025, S1132.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the State Independent Living Council $11,600
from the General Fund to be expended for Personnel Costs for the period July
1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the State Independent Living Council is hereby re-
duced by $11,600 for Personnel Costs from the State Independent Living Coun-
cil Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.